tables/th-g2.ctb
# liblouis: Thai Current Braille System.
#
#-index-name: Thai, contracted, grade 2
#-display-name: Thai braille grade 2
#
#+language: th
#+type: literary
#+system: thai
#+contraction: full
#+grade: 2
#+dots: 6
#
#+direction: forward
#
#-copyright: 2024, Thai braille fund and FOUNDATION FOR THE BLIND IN THAILAND UNDER THE ROYAL PATRONAGE OF H.M. THE QUEEN.
#
#  Copyright (C) 2024 by Thai braille fund and FOUNDATION FOR THE BLIND IN THAILAND UNDER THE ROYAL PATRONAGE OF H.M. THE QUEEN.
#
# Version 2024-08-24
#
# This file is part of liblouis.
#
# liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
# under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
# published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
# License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
# liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
# WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
# Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
# License along with liblouis. If not, see
# <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
#
# Created and maintained by: Chatupol Nootatong <jpt@tab.or.th>
#	- Dr.Wiraman Niyomphol <wiraman.n@gmail.com>
#	- Itsawat Banlawanich <peet.itsawat@gmail.com>
# Based on <https://www.tab.or.th/braille_spec/thaibraille.pdf>
#
#-maintainer: Chatupol Nootatong <jpt@tab.or.th>
#-author: Chatupol Nootatong <jpt@tab.or.th>
#-author: Dr. Wiraman Niyomphol <wiraman.n@gmail.com>
#-author: Itsawat Banlawanich <peet.itsawat@gmail.com>

include en-ueb-g2.ctb
include spaces.uti

# Thai Consinants
letter \x0e01 1245 # ก
letter \x0e02 13 # ข
letter \x0e03 13b # ฃ
letter \x0e04 136 # ค
letter \x0e05 136a # ฅ
letter \x0e06 1369 # ฆ
letter \x0e07 12456 # ง
letter \x0e08 245 # จ
letter \x0e09 34 # ฉ
letter \x0e0a 346 # ช
letter \x0e0b 2346 # ซ
letter \x0e0c 3469 # ฌ
letter \x0e0d 134569 # ญ
letter \x0e0e 1459 # ฎ
letter \x0e0f 12569 # ฏ
letter \x0e10 23459 # ฐ
letter \x0e11 234569 # ฑ
letter \x0e12 23456a # ฒ
letter \x0e13 13459 # ณ
letter \x0e14 145 # ด
letter \x0e15 1256 # ต
letter \x0e16 2345 # ถ
letter \x0e17 23456 # ท
letter \x0e18 23456b # ธ
letter \x0e19 1345 # น
letter \x0e1a 1236 # บ
letter \x0e1b 12346 # ป
letter \x0e1c 1234 # ผ
letter \x0e1d 1346 # ฝ
letter \x0e1e 1456 # พ
letter \x0e1f 1246 # ฟ
letter \x0e20 14569 # ภ
letter \x0e21 134 # ม
letter \x0e22 13456 # ย
letter \x0e23 1235 # ร
letter \x0e25 123 # ล
letter \x0e27 2456 # ว
letter \x0e28 2349 # ศ
letter \x0e29 234a # ษ
letter \x0e2a 234 # ส
letter \x0e2b 125 # ห
letter \x0e2c 1239 # ฬ
letter \x0e2d 135 # อ
letter \x0e2e 123456 # ฮ

# Thai vowel
letter \x0e30 1 # ะ
letter \x0e31 345 # ั
letter \x0e47 3 # ็
letter \x0e32 16 # า
letter \x0e34 12 # ิ
letter \x0e35 23 # ี
letter \x0e38 14 # ุ
letter \x0e39 25 # ู
letter \x0e36 246 # ึ
letter \x0e37 26 # ื
letter \x0e40 124 # เ
letter \x0e41 126 # แ
letter \x0e42 24 # โ
letter \x0e33 1356 # ำ
letter \x0e44 156 # ไ
letter \x0e43 156-2 # ใ
letter \x0e24 1235-2 # ฤ
letter \x0e26 123-2 # ฦ
letter \x0e48 35 # ่
letter \x0e49 256 # ้
letter \x0e4a 2356 # ๊
letter \x0e4b 236 # ๋
sign ? 236 # ?
sign \x0e46 2 # ๆ
sign \x0e4c 356 # ์
sign \x0e4d 5 # ํ
sign \x0e3a 3 # ฺ
sign \x0e2f 56-23 # ฯ
sign \x0e3f 4-12 # ฿
sign \x0e45 5-16 # ๅ
sign \x0e4e 4-15 # ๎
sign \x0e4f 4-14 # ๏
sign \x0e5a 4-256 # ๚
sign \x0e5b 4-23 # ๛

# make phayan yai
noback pass2 @56-23-123-56-23 @56-123

# Thai digit
digit \x0e50 245b # ๐
digit \x0e51 1b # ๑
digit \x0e52 12b # ๒
digit \x0e53 14b # ๓
digit \x0e54 145b # ๔
digit \x0e55 15b # ๕
digit \x0e56 124b # ๖
digit \x0e57 1245b # ๗
digit \x0e58 125b # ๘
digit \x0e59 24b # ๙

#attribute Thai Consinants
attribute thaiconsinants \x0e01\x0e02\x0e03\x0e04\x0e05\x0e06\x0e07\x0e08\x0e09\x0e0a\x0e0b\x0e0c\x0e0d\x0e0e\x0e0f\x0e10\x0e11\x0e12\x0e13\x0e14\x0e15\x0e16\x0e17\x0e18\x0e19\x0e1a\x0e1b\x0e1c\x0e1d\x0e1e\x0e1f\x0e20\x0e21\x0e22\x0e23\x0e25\x0e27\x0e28\x0e29\x0e2a\x0e2b\x0e2c\x0e2d\x0e2e

#attribute tone marks
attribute tonemarks \x0e48\x0e49\x0e4a\x0e4b

#attribute Thai Consinants for punctuation
attribute forpunc \x0e01\x0e02\x0e03\x0e04\x0e05\x0e06\x0e07\x0e08\x0e09\x0e0a\x0e0b\x0e0c\x0e0d\x0e0e\x0e0f\x0e10\x0e11\x0e12\x0e13\x0e14\x0e15\x0e16\x0e17\x0e18\x0e19\x0e1a\x0e1b\x0e1c\x0e1d\x0e1e\x0e1f\x0e20\x0e21\x0e22\x0e23\x0e25\x0e27\x0e28\x0e29\x0e2a\x0e2b\x0e2c\x0e2d\x0e2e\x0e30\x0e47\x0e32\x0e34\x0e35\x0e38\x0e39\x0e36\x0e37\x0e33\x0e48\x0e49\x0e4a\x0e4b\x0e46\x0e4c\x0e2f\x0e41

# swap for context
swapcd thaiconsinantsCD \x0e01\x0e02\x0e03\x0e04\x0e05\x0e06\x0e07\x0e08\x0e09\x0e0a\x0e0b\x0e0c\x0e0d\x0e0e\x0e0f\x0e10\x0e11\x0e12\x0e13\x0e14\x0e15\x0e16\x0e17\x0e18\x0e19\x0e1a\x0e1b\x0e1c\x0e1d\x0e1e\x0e1f\x0e20\x0e21\x0e22\x0e23\x0e25\x0e27\x0e28\x0e29\x0e2a\x0e2b\x0e2c\x0e2d\x0e2e 1245,13,356-13,136,36-136,6-136,12456,245,34,346,2346,6-346,6-13456,6-145,6-1256,6-2345,6-23456,36-23456,6-1345,145,1256,2345,23456,356-23456,1345,1236,12346,1234,1346,1456,1246,6-1456,134,13456,1235,123,2456,6-234,36-234,234,125,6-123,135,123456
swapcd tonemarksContext \x0e48\x0e49\x0e4a\x0e4b 359,2569,23569,2369

# swap for multipass
swapdd tonemarksPass 359,2569,23569,2369 35,256,2356,236

#attribute Thai Consinants for match
attribute 1 \x0e01\x0e02\x0e03\x0e04\x0e05\x0e06\x0e07\x0e08\x0e09\x0e0a\x0e0b\x0e0c\x0e0d\x0e0e\x0e0f\x0e10\x0e11\x0e12\x0e13\x0e14\x0e15\x0e16\x0e17\x0e18\x0e19\x0e1a\x0e1b\x0e1c\x0e1d\x0e1e\x0e1f\x0e20\x0e21\x0e22\x0e23\x0e25\x0e27\x0e28\x0e29\x0e2a\x0e2b\x0e2c\x0e2d\x0e2e\x0e30\x0e31\x0e47\x0e32\x0e34\x0e35\x0e38\x0e39\x0e36\x0e37\x0e40\x0e41\x0e42\x0e33\x0e44\x0e43\x0e24\x0e26\x0e48\x0e49\x0e4a\x0e4b\x0e46\x0e4c\x0e4d\x0e3a\x0e2f\x0e3f\x0e45\x0e4e\x0e4f\x0e5a\x0e5b

#Move the tone to the back of the vowel.
noback correct [$x]"\x0e30" "\x0e30"*
noback correct [$x]"\x0e33" "\x0e33"*

#attribute ToneAndVowels
attribute ToneAndVowels \x0e30\x0e31\x0e47\x0e32\x0e34\x0e35\x0e38\x0e39\x0e36\x0e37\x0e33\x0e48\x0e49\x0e4a\x0e4b
attribute 2 \x0e30\x0e31\x0e47\x0e32\x0e34\x0e35\x0e38\x0e39\x0e36\x0e37\x0e33\x0e48\x0e49\x0e4a\x0e4b # สระตามหลัง
attribute Ahead \x0e44\x0e43\x0e42\x0e40 # สระนำหน้าทั้งหลาย
swapdd Aheadbrl 156,156-2,24,124 156,156-2,24,124 # ไใโเ

#ลดรูปสระเออไม่มีตัวสะกด
attribute leadcharacterSaraEr \x0E01\x0E02\x0E1B\x0E1A\x0E1C\x0E2A\x0E2B
attribute diphthongSaraEr \x0E23\x0E25\x0E22\x0E19\x0E21
noback context "\x0e40"[%thaiconsinants]"\x0e2d\x0e2d\x0E01" @124*@135-135-1245
noback context "\x0e40"[%thaiconsinants]"\x0E2D\x0E22\x0E48" @124*@135-13456-35
noback context "\x0e40"[%thaiconsinants]"\x0E2D\x0E22\x0E39\x0E48" @124*@135-13456-25-35
noback context "\x0e40"[%leadcharacterSaraEr%diphthongSaraEr]"\x0e2d\x0e2d\x0E01" @124*@135-135-1245
noback context "\x0e40"[%leadcharacterSaraEr%diphthongSaraEr]"\x0E2D\x0E22\x0E48" @124*@135-13456-35
noback context "\x0e40"[%leadcharacterSaraEr%diphthongSaraEr]"\x0E2D\x0E22\x0E39\x0E48" @124*@135-13456-25-35
noback context "\x0e40"[%thaiconsinants]"\x0E2D\x0E22\x0e32\x0e01" @124*@135-13456-16-1245 # เ-อยาก
noback context "\x0e40"[%thaiconsinants]"\x0e48\x0E2D\x0E22\x0e32\x0e01" @124*@35-135-13456-16-1245 # เ-่อยาก
noback context "\x0e40"[%thaiconsinants]"\x0e49\x0E2D\x0E22\x0e32\x0e01" @124*@256-135-13456-16-1245 # เ-้อยาก
noback context "\x0e40"[%leadcharacterSaraEr%diphthongSaraEr]"\x0E2D\x0E22\x0E39\x0E48" @124*@135-13456-25-35 # เ--อยู่
noback context "\x0e40"[%thaiconsinants]"\x0e48\x0E2D\x0E22\x0E39\x0E48" @124*@35-135-13456-25-35 # เ-่อยู่
noback context "\x0e40"[%thaiconsinants]"\x0e49\x0E2D\x0E22\x0E39\x0E48" @124*@256-135-13456-25-35 # เ-้อยู่

noback context "\x0e40"[%thaiconsinants]"\x0e2d"!%ToneAndVowels_ *@146
noback context "\x0e40"[%thaiconsinants]"\x0e48\x0e2d" *@146-359
noback context "\x0e40"[%thaiconsinants]"\x0e49\x0e2d" *@146-2569
noback context "\x0e40"[%thaiconsinants]"\x0e4A\x0e2d" *@146-23569
noback context "\x0e40"[%thaiconsinants]"\x0e4B\x0e2d" *@146-2369
noback context "\x0e40"[%leadcharacterSaraEr%diphthongSaraEr]"\x0e2d" *@146
noback context "\x0e40"[%leadcharacterSaraEr%diphthongSaraEr]"\x0e48\x0e2d" *@146-359
noback context "\x0e40"[%leadcharacterSaraEr%diphthongSaraEr]"\x0e49\x0e2d" *@146-2569
noback context "\x0e40"[%leadcharacterSaraEr%diphthongSaraEr]"\x0e4A\x0e2d" *@146-23569
noback context "\x0e40"[%leadcharacterSaraEr%diphthongSaraEr]"\x0e4B\x0e2d" *@146-2369
noback pass2 @146%tonemarksPass@1 @146-1%tonemarksPass
noback always \x0E17\x0E30\x0E40\x0E25\x0E2D\x0E30\x0E44\x0E23 23456-1-124-123-135-1-156-1235
noback always \x0E40\x0E17\x0E2D\x0E21 124-23456-135-134
noback always \x0E40\x0E17\x0E2D\x0E0D 124-23456-135-6-13456
noback always \x0E40\x0E04\x0E2D\x0E22 124-136-135-13456
noback always \x0E40\x0E2A\x0E21\x0E2D\x0E07 124-234-134-135-12456

#ลดรูปสระเออมีตัวสะกด
attribute leadcharacterSaraErSp \x0E01\x0E02\x0E04\x0E08\x0E17\x0E09\x0E16\x0E15\x0E1C\x0E1E\x0E2A\x0E2B
attribute diphthongSaraErSp \x0E23\x0E25\x0E0A\x0E2D\x0E22
noback context "\x0e40"[%thaiconsinants]"\x0e34" *@146
noback context "\x0e40"[%leadcharacterSaraErSp%diphthongSaraErSp]"\x0e34" *@146
noback always \x0E40\x0E1C\x0E2D\x0e34\x0E0D 1234-135-146-6-13456
noback always \x0E40\x0E15\x0E0A\x0E34\x0E19 124-1256-346-12-1345

# ลดรูปสระเอีย
attribute leadcharacterSaraIa \x0E01\x0E04\x0E08\x0E09\x0E15\x0E1B\x0E1E\x0E2A\x0E2B
attribute diphthongSaraIa \x0E27\x0E23\x0E25\x0E28\x0E29\x0E1A\x0E07\x0E19\x0E21\x0E22
noback context "\x0e40"[%thaiconsinants]"\x0E35\x0E22" *@12356
noback context "\x0e40"[%thaiconsinants]"\x0E35\x0E48\x0E22" *@12356-359
noback context "\x0e40"[%thaiconsinants]"\x0E35\x0E49\x0E22" *@12356-2569
noback context "\x0e40"[%thaiconsinants]"\x0E35\x0E4A\x0E22" *@12356-23569
noback context "\x0e40"[%thaiconsinants]"\x0E35\x0E4B\x0E22" *@12356-2369
noback context "\x0e40"[%leadcharacterSaraIa%diphthongSaraIa]"\x0E35\x0E22"!"\x0E4C"_ *@12356
noback context "\x0e40"[%leadcharacterSaraIa%diphthongSaraIa]"\x0E35\x0E48\x0E22" *@12356-359
noback context "\x0e40"[%leadcharacterSaraIa%diphthongSaraIa]"\x0E35\x0E49\x0E22" *@12356-2569
noback context "\x0e40"[%leadcharacterSaraIa%diphthongSaraIa]"\x0E35\x0E4A\x0E22" *@12356-23569
noback context "\x0e40"[%leadcharacterSaraIa%diphthongSaraIa]"\x0E35\x0E4B\x0E22" *@12356-2369
noback pass2 @12356%tonemarksPass@1 @12356-1%tonemarksPass
noback always \x0E40\x0E15\x0E21\x0E35\x0E22 124-1256-134-23-13456
noback always \x0E40\x0E2A\x0E23\x0E35\x0E22 124-234-1235-23-13456

# ลดรูปสระเอือ
#อักษรนำและตามสำหรับสระเอือ
attribute leadcharacterSaraYea \x0E01\x0E02\x0E04\x0E21\x0E1B\x0E1E\x0E2A\x0E2B
attribute diphthongSaraYea \x0E07\x0E23\x0E25\x0E21\x0E22\x0E19
noback context "\x0e40"[%thaiconsinants]"\x0E37\x0E2D" *@12345
noback context "\x0e40"[%thaiconsinants]"\x0E37\x0E48\x0E2D" *@12345-35
noback context "\x0e40"[%thaiconsinants]"\x0E37\x0E49\x0E2D" *@12345-256
noback context "\x0e40"[%thaiconsinants]"\x0E37\x0E4A\x0E2D" *@12345-2356
noback context "\x0e40"[%thaiconsinants]"\x0E37\x0E4B\x0E2D" *@12345-236
noback context "\x0e40"[%leadcharacterSaraYea%diphthongSaraYea]"\x0E37\x0E2D" *@12345
noback context "\x0e40"[%leadcharacterSaraYea%diphthongSaraYea]"\x0E37\x0E48\x0E2D" *@12345-35
noback context "\x0e40"[%leadcharacterSaraYea%diphthongSaraYea]"\x0E37\x0E49\x0E2D" *@12345-256
noback context "\x0e40"[%leadcharacterSaraYea%diphthongSaraYea]"\x0E37\x0E4A\x0E2D" *@12345-2356
noback context "\x0e40"[%leadcharacterSaraYea%diphthongSaraYea]"\x0E37\x0E4B\x0E2D" *@12345-236
